Utah statutes.
31A-21-404.   Out-of-state insurers.
Any insurer extending mass marketed life or accident and health insurance
under a group or blanket policy issued outside of this state to residents of
this state shall, with respect to the mass marketed life or accident and
health insurance policy:
(1)  comply with:
(a)  Sections 31A-23a-402 and 31A-23a-403; and
(b)  Chapter 26, Part 3, Claim Practices; and
(2)  upon the commissioner's request, deliver to the commissioner a copy of
any mass marketed life or accident and health insurance policy, certificates
issued under these policies, and advertising material used in this state in
connection with the policy.
